Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-34] State and county contributions;
retired employees with fewer than ten years of service. (a) This section
shall apply to state and county contributions to the fund for employees
specified in paragraph (1)(E) of the definition of "employee" in section
87A-1 who:

(1) Were hired on or before June 30, 1996; and

(2) Retired after June 30, 1984, with fewer than ten
years of credited service, excluding sick leave.

(b) The State, through the department of
budget and finance, and the counties, through their respective departments of
finance, shall pay to the fund a monthly contribution equal to one-half of the
base monthly contribution set forth under section 87A-33(b) for retired
employees enrolled in medicare or non-medicare health benefits plans. If both
husband and wife are employee-beneficiaries, the total contribution by the
State or county shall not exceed the monthly contribution for supplemental
medicare family or non-medicare family plan, as appropriate. [L 2001, c 88, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next